Maryland, session 2025, SB0910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 15–1309 of Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis of the Annotated
Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 15–1310.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
SECTION 1. BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
15–102.
This title applies only in Caroline County.
15–1309. 15–1004.
(A) THERE IS A RURAL SPECIAL EVENT VENUE BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR
LICENSE.
(B) THE BOARD MAY ISSUE THE LICENSE:
(1) TO THE OWNER OF A VENUE THAT IS ZONED AS A RURAL SPECIAL
EVENT VENUE UNDER COUNTY LAW; AND
(2) (I) TO THE SAME APPLICANT FOR ALL EVENTS FOR WHICH THE
LICENSE IS ISSUED; AND
(II) FOR USE AT ONLY ONE PREMISES.
(C) THE LICENSE AUTHORIZES THE LICENSE HOLDER TO SELL BEER, WINE,
AND LIQUOR FOR ON–PREMISES CONSUMPTION.
(D) THE LICENSE MAY NOT BE TRANSFERRED TO ANOTHER LOCATION.
(E) A LICENSE HOLDER MAY SELL BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR DURING THE
HOURS SET IN COUNTY LAW FOR RURAL SPECIAL EVENT VENUES.
(F) A LICENSE HOLDER MAY PURCHASE BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR ONLY
FROM A LICENSED WHOLESALER.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 830
(G) A LICENSE HOLDER IS SUBJECT TO THE ALCOHOL AWARENESS
TRAINING REQUIREMENTS UNDER § 4–505 OF THIS ARTICLE AND § 15–1902 OF THIS
TITLE.
(H) THE FEE FOR A RURAL SPECIAL EVENT VENUE LICENSE IS:
(1) $250 FOR NOT MORE THAN 10 EVENTS PER YEAR;
(2) $500 FOR NOT MORE THAN 20 EVENTS PER YEAR;
(3) $750 FOR NOT MORE THAN 30 EVENTS PER YEAR; AND
(4) $1,000 FOR NOT MORE THAN 40 EVENTS PER YEAR.
15–1308.
(a) Instead of issuing individual event licenses, the Board may issue a multiple
event license for a particular class of license.
(b) The number of days for which a multiple event license may be used by a single
applicant may not exceed 40 per calendar year.
(c) (1) A multiple event license shall be issued:
(i) for one premises only; and
(ii) except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, to the
same applicant for all events for which the license is issued.
(2) The Board may:
(i) approve in writing a substitute applicant; and
(ii) before approving a substitute applicant, hold a hearing.
(d) A server who is certified as having completed an alcohol awareness program
shall be on the premises for which a multiple event license is issued when alcoholic
beverages are served.
(E) (1) THE HOLDER OF A MULTIPLE EVENT LICENSE UNDER THIS
SECTION MAY STORE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES ON THE LICENSED PREMISES
BETWEEN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED EVENTS IF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES:
(I) ARE IN A SPECIALLY IDENTIFIED LOCKED AND SECURED
LOCATION; AND
– 3 –

Ch. 830 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) ARE NOT SOLD OR CONSUMED EXCEPT DURING LICENSED
EVENT HOURS FOR LICENSED EVENT PURPOSES.
(2) (I) THE LICENSE HOLDER SHALL KEEP COMPLETE AND
ACCURATE RECORDS OF ALL ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES PURCHASED AND SOLD ON
THE LICENSED PREMISES.
(II) THE RECORDS SHALL BE:
1. MAINTAINED ON THE LICENSED PREMISES FOR 2
YEARS; AND
2. AVAILABLE FOR INSPECTION BY AUTHORIZED
PERSONNEL OF THE COMPTROLLER, THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, AND THE BOARD.
(III) THE RECORDS SHALL INCLUDE A COMPLETED PRE– AND
POST–INVENTORY OF ALL ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES FOR EACH INDIVIDUAL EVENT.
(3) AUTHORIZED PERSONNEL OF THE COMPTROLLER, THE
EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, AND THE BOARD MAY INSPECT THE PREMISES OF THE
LICENSE HOLDER AS PROVIDED UNDER § 6–202 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(4) A LICENSE HOLDER WHO VIOLATES THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT
TO:
(I) FOR THE FIRST OFFENSE, A FINE OF $100; AND
(II) FOR A SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $500
AND DENIAL OF FUTURE REQUESTS FOR A LICENSE FOR AN INDIVIDUAL EVENT OR A
SPECIAL MULTIPLE EVENT LICENSE.
[(e)] (F) (1) The fee for a multiple event license is:
(i) $250 for not more than 10 events per year;
(ii) $500 for not more than 20 events per year;
(iii) $750 for not more than 30 events per year; and
(iv) $1,000 for not more than 40 events per year.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 830
(2) The Board may not issue a refund if the license holder holds fewer
events during the calendar year than the number of events that the license holder is
entitled to hold.
15–1310. [15–1309.]
(a) This section applies only to:
(1) volunteer fire companies; AND
(2) A HOLDER OF A MULTIPLE EVENT LICENSE UNDER § 15–1308 OF
THIS SUBTITLE OR A RURAL SPECIAL EVENT VENUE LICENSE UNDER § 15–1309 OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
(b) Alcoholic beverages may be stored on the licensed premises between
individual licensed events if the alcoholic beverages:
(1) are in a specially identified locked and secured location; and
(2) are not sold or consumed except during licensed event hours for licensed
event purposes.
(c) (1) A license holder shall keep complete and accurate records of all
alcoholic beverages purchased and sold on the licensed premises.
(2) The records shall be:
(i) maintained on the licensed premises for 2 years; and
(ii) available for inspection by authorized personnel of the
Comptroller, the Executive Director, and the Board.
(3) The records shall include a completed pre– and post–inventory of all
alcoholic beverages for each individual event.
(d) Authorized personnel of the Comptroller, the Executive Director, and the
Board may inspect the premises of a license holder as provided under § 6–202 of this article.
(e) A license holder who violates this section is subject to:
(1) for the first offense, a fine of $100; and
(2) for a subsequent offense, a fine not exceeding $500 and denial of future
requests for a license for an individual event or a special multiple event license.
– 5 –

Ch. 830 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 6 –